Maine, session 132, LD204.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3210, sub-§2, ¶B-3, as amended by PL 2019, c. 477, §1, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) Whose total power production capacity does not exceed 100 megawatts and
relies on one or more of the following:
(a) Fuel cells;
(b) Tidal power;
(d) Geothermal installations;
(e) Hydroelectric generators that meet all state and federal fish passage
requirements applicable to the generator;
(f) Biomass generators that are fueled by wood, wood waste or landfill gas; or
(g) Anaerobic digestion of by-products of waste from animals or agricultural
crops, food or vegetative material, algae or organic refuse; or
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3210, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 2009, c. 542, §5, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (2) to read:
(2) Whose total power production capacity does not exceed 100 megawatts and
that relies on one or more of the following:
(a) Fuel cells;
(b) Tidal power;
(c) Solar arrays and installations;
(d) Wind power installations;
(e) Geothermal installations;
(f) Hydroelectric generators;
(g) Biomass generators that are fueled by wood or wood waste, landfill gas or
anaerobic digestion of agricultural products, by-products or wastes; or
(h) Generators fueled by municipal solid waste in conjunction with recycling.